Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.235.280

Free school meals—Systems to identify students.

(1) Local liaisons for homeless children and youths designated by districts in accordance with the federal McKinney-Vento homeless assistance act 42 U.S.C. Sec. 11431 et seq. must improve systems to identify homeless students and coordinate with the applicable school nutrition program to ensure that each homeless student has proper access to free school meals and that applicable accountability and reporting requirements are satisfied.

(2) Schools and school districts shall improve systems to identify students in foster care, runaway students, and migrant students to ensure that each student has proper access to free school meals and that applicable accountability and reporting requirements are satisfied.

(3) At least monthly, schools and school districts shall directly certify students for free school meals if the students qualify because of enrollment in assistance programs, including but not limited to the supplemental nutrition assistance program, the temporary assistance for needy families, and medicaid.

[ 2018 c 271 s 2.]

NOTES:

Short title—2018 c 271: See note following RCW 28A.235.250.